en: 1% for the planet, 1 percent for the planet, one percent for the planet
bg: 1% за планетата
ca: 1% pel planeta
de: 1% für den Planeten
es: 1% para el planeta, uno por ciento para el planeta
fi: 1% planeetalle, prosentti planeetalle
fr: 1% pour la planète
it: 1% per il pianeta
nl: 1% voor de planeet
pt: 1% para o planeta, 1 porcento para o planeta, 1 por cento para o planeta, um por cento para o planeta, um porcento para o planeta

en: 100% natural
xx: 100% natural
bg: 100% натурално
da: 100% naturlig
de: 100% natürlich
fi: 100% luonnollinen, 100% luontainen
fr: 100% naturel
he: 100% טבעי
hr: 100% prirodni, 100% prirodni sastojci
hu: 100% természetes
it: 100% naturale
nl: 100% natuurlijk
pt: 100% natural, cem por cento natural, cem porcento natural
ru: 100% натуральное, 100% натуральный, 100% натуральная, 100% натуральные, 100% натуральный продукт, натуральный продукт
sv: 100% naturlig, 100% naturligt, 100% naturliga
th: ธรรมชาติ 100%
tr: %100 doğal

en: 100% vegetable
xx: 100% vegetal
de: 100% pflanzlich
fi: 100% kasvis
fr: 100% végétal, 100% végétale
he: 100% צמחי
hu: 100% növényi, 100%-ban növényi
it: 100% vegetale
nl: 100% plantaardig
pt: 100% vegetal, cem por cento vegetal, cem porcento vegetal
ru: 100% овощной
sv: 100% växtbaserad
th: ใช้น้ำมันพืช 100%
tr: %100 sebze

en: Not hardened
ca: Sense endurir
da: uhærdet
de: ungehärtet
es: No endurecido
fi: kovettamaton, ei kovetettu
fr: Non durci
nl: Ongehard
pt: Não endurecido
ru: Не закаленный

en: Assured Food Standards, assured food standard, Red Tractor
xx: Assured Food Standards, Red Tractor
ca: Assured Food Standards
de: gesicherte Essens Standards
fi: assured food standards, punainen traktori
ru: гарантированный пищевой стандарт

xx: Varefakta kontrolleret, Varefakta
da: Varefakta kontrolleret

de: Nach traditioneller Art, Hausmacher Art
fr: À l'ancienne

en: Authentic Trappist Product
es: Authentic Trappist Product, Producto trapense auténtico
fi: Authentic Trappist Product, aito trappistituote
fr: Produit trappiste authentique
nl: Authentiek Trappistenproduct
ru: аутентичный траппистский продукт, настоящий траппистский продукт

xx: CE
en: CE, CE marking
fr: CE, Marquage CE

xx: UKCA, UK Conformity Assessed
en: UKCA, UKCA marking
de: UKCA, UKCA-Kennzeichnung

nl: Beter Leven
xx: beter leven

nl: Beter Leven 1 ster
xx: Beter Leven 1 ster

nl: Beter Leven 2 ster, Beter Leven 2 sterren
xx: Beter Leven 2 ster, Beter Leven 2 sterren

nl: Beter Leven 3 ster, Beter Leven 3 sterren
xx: Beter Leven 3 ster, Beter Leven 3 sterren

en: Free range
bg: Свободно отглеждане
ca: Rang lliure
da: fritgående
de: Freiland
es: de corral
fi: vapaana laiduntava, ulkoilma
fr: Plein air
he: גידול חופשי
hu: Szabad tartású
it: Allevamento a terra
nb: frittgående
nl: Vrije uitloop
pt: Em liberdade, ao ar livre
ru: свободный выгул, открытый воздух
sv: frigående

en: French eggs, Eggs from France, Oeufs de France
bg: Френски яйца
ca: Ous francesos, Ous de França
de: Französiche Eier, Eier aus Frankreich
es: Huevos originados en Francia
fi: ranskalaisia munia, munien alkuperä Ranska
fr: Oeufs de France, Oeufs français
he: ביצים צרפתיות, ביצים מצרפת
it: Uova francesi, Uova dalla Francia
nl: Franse eieren, eieren uit Frankrijk
pt: Ovos franceses, Ovos de França, Ovos originários de França

fr: Oeufs origine France
es: Huevos de origen Francia
it: Uova di origine Francia
pt: Ovos de origem França

en: Free range eggs
bg: Яйца от свободно отгледани кокошки
ca: Ous de gallines lliures
da: æg fra fritgående høns
de: Freilandeier, eier aus bodenhaltung
es: Huevos de gallinas camperas
fi: ulkokananmunat, ulkokanalasta
fr: Œufs de poules élevées en plein air, Œufs de plein air, Œufs plein air, Œufs de poules élevées en plein air, Œufs de poule élevée en plein air, Œufs de poules élevées en plein air, Œuf de poule fermière élevée en liberté
he: ביצי חופש
hr: iz slobodnog uzgoja, iz štalskog uzgoja, iz štalskog (podnog) uzgoja, iz podnog uzgoja
hu: Szabad tartású tojás
it: Uova da allevamento all'aperto, uova da galline allevate all'aperto
nb: egg fra frittgående høner
nl: Vrije uitloop eieren
pl: jaja z chowu na wolnym wybiegu, 1 - jajka z chowu na wolnym wybiegu, 1 - jaja z chowu na wolnym wybiegu
pt: Ovos de galinhas criadas em liberdade, ovos de galinhas em liberdade, ovos de galinhas livres de gaiolas, ovos de galinhas criadas ao ar livre, ovos de galinhas ao ar livre
sv: ägg från frigående höns

en: Made with free range eggs, Baked with free range eggs
ca: Fet amb ous de gallines criades lliures
de: Aus Freilandeiern, Enhält Freilandeier, Mit Freilandeiern gebacken
fi: valmistettu käyttäen ulkokananmunia, ulkokananmunista valmistettu, leivottu käyttäen ulkokananmunia
fr: Fait avec des œufs de poules élevées en plein air, Fait avec des œufs de poules en liberté, Cuisiné avec des œufs de plein air, Fait avec des œufs de poules élevées en liberté
it: Prodotto con uova da allevamento all'aperto
pt: Feito com ovos de galinhas criadas em liberdade, Feito com ovos de galinhas em liberdade, Feito com ovos de galinhas livres de gaiolas, Feito com ovos de galinhas criadas ao ar livre, Feito com ovos de galinhas ao ar livre

en: May contain eggshell, may contain egg shell
es: Puede contener cáscara de huevo
it: Può contenere guscio d'uovo, può contenere gusci di uova
pt: Pode conter cascas de ovo, pode conter casca de ovo, pode conter vestígios de cascas de ovo, pode conter vestígios de casca de ovo